California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The juvenile court shall, within five days of completing its review, transmit its decision, in writing, to the probate court. The probate court shall file the decision in question in the guardianship proceeding and shall make it available only to persons entitled to receive reports pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1513 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 578, Sec. 5.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

331.5.

When any officer has referred or delivered a child to an agency pursuant to Section 307.5, and that agency does not initiate a service program for the child within the time periods required by Section 328.3, the referring agency may, within 10 court days following receipt of the notification from the referral agency, apply to the social worker for a review of that decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

332.

A petition to commence proceedings in the juvenile court to declare a child a dependent child of the court shall be verified and shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name of the court to which it is addressed.

(b) The title of the proceeding.

(c) The code section and the subdivision under which the proceedings are instituted. If it is alleged that the child is a person described by subdivision (e) of Section 300, the petition shall include an allegation pursuant to that section.

(d) The name, age, and address, if any, of the child upon whose behalf the petition is brought. If it is known or
 there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, the petition shall also include the last known address of the child.

(e) The names and residence addresses, if known to the petitioner, of all parents, any guardian of the child, and any Indian custodian. If there is no parent, guardian, or Indian custodian residing within the state, or if his or her place of residence is not known to the petitioner, the petition shall also contain the name and residence address, if known, of any adult relative residing within the county, or, if there is none, the adult relative residing nearest to the location of the court. If it is known to the petitioner that one of the parents is a victim of domestic violence and that parent is currently living separately from the batterer-parent, the address of the victim-parent shall remain confidential.

(f) A concise statement of facts, separately
 stated, to support the conclusion that the child upon whose behalf the petition is being brought is a person within the definition of each of the sections and subdivisions under which the proceedings are being instituted.

(g) The fact that the child upon whose behalf the petition is brought is detained in custody or is not detained in custody, and if he or she is detained in custody, the date and the precise time the child was taken into custody.

(h) A notice to the father, mother, spouse, or other person liable for support of the child, of all of the following: (1) Section 903 makes that person, the estate of that person, and the estate of the child, liable for the cost of the care, support, and maintenance of the child in any county institution or any other place in which the child is placed, detained, or committed pursuant to an order of the juvenile court; (2) Section 903.1
 makes that person, the estate of that person, and the estate of the child, liable for the cost to the county of legal services rendered to the child or the parent by a private attorney or a public defender appointed pursuant to the order of the juvenile court; (3) Section 903.2 makes that person, the estate of that person, and the estate of the child, liable for the cost to the county of the supervision of the child by the social worker pursuant to the order of the juvenile court; and (4) the liabilities established by these sections are joint and several.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 24.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

333.

Any petition filed in juvenile court to commence proceedings pursuant to this chapter that is not verified may be dismissed without prejudice by such court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

334.

Upon the filing of the petition, the clerk of the juvenile court shall set the same for hearing within 30 days, except that in the case of a minor detained in custody at the time of the filing of the petition, the petition must be set for hearing within 15 judicial days from the date of the order of the court directing such detention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

338.

In addition to the notice provided in Sections 290.1 and 290.2 the juvenile court may issue its citation directing any parent or guardian of the person concerning whom a petition has been filed to appear at the time and place set for any hearing or financial evaluation under the provisions of this chapter, including a hearing under the provisions of Section 257, and directing any person having custody or control of the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed to bring such minor with him or her. The notice shall in addition state that a parent or guardian may be required to participate in a counseling program with the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed. Personal service of such citation shall be made at least 24 hours before the time stated therein for that appearance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 416, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

339.

In case such citation cannot be served, or the person served fails to obey it, or in any case in which it appears to the court that the citation will probably be ineffective, a warrant of arrest may issue on the order of the court either against the parent, or guardian, or the person having the custody of the minor, or with whom the minor is living.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

340.

(a) Whenever a petition has been filed in the juvenile court alleging that a minor comes within Section 300 and praying for a hearing on that petition, or whenever any subsequent petition has been filed praying for a hearing in the matter of the minor and it appears to the court that the circumstances of his or her home environment may endanger the health, person, or welfare of the minor, or whenever a dependent minor has run away from his or her court-ordered placement, a protective custody warrant may be issued immediately for the minor.

(b) A protective custody warrant may be issued without filing a petition under Section 300 if the court finds probable
 cause to support all of the following:

(1) The child is a person described in Section 300.

(2) There is a substantial danger to the safety or to the physical or emotional health of the child.

(3) There are no reasonable means to protect the child’s safety or physical health without removal.

(c) Any child taken into protective custody pursuant to this section shall immediately be delivered to the social worker who shall investigate, pursuant to Section 309, the facts
 and circumstances of the child and the facts surrounding the child being taken into custody and attempt to maintain the child with the child’s family through the provision of services.

(d) (1) Nothing in this section is intended to limit any other circumstance that permits a magistrate to issue a warrant for a person.

(2) Nothing in this section is intended to limit a social worker from taking into and maintaining temporary
 custody of a minor pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 306.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (AB 1401)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

340.5.

(a) Whenever pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 360) a social worker is assigned to provide child welfare services, family reunification services, or other services to a dependent child of the juvenile court, the juvenile court may, for good cause shown and after an ex parte hearing, issue its order restraining the parents of the dependent child from threatening the social worker, or any member of the social worker’s family, with physical harm. 

(b) For purposes of this section, “good cause” means at least one threat of physical harm to the social worker, or any member of the social worker’s family, made by the person who is to be the subject of the restraining order, with the apparent ability to carry out the threat. 

(c) Violation of a restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall be punishable as contempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 980, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

341.

Upon request of the social worker, district attorney, the child, or the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian, or on the court’s own motion, the court or the clerk of the court, or an attorney, pursuant to Section 1985 of the Code of Civil Procedure, shall issue subpoenas requiring attendance and testimony of witnesses and production of papers at any hearing regarding a child who is alleged or determined by the court to be a person described by Section 300. When a person attends a juvenile court hearing as a witness upon a subpoena, in its discretion, the court may by an order on its minutes, direct the county auditor to draw his or her warrant upon the county treasurer in favor of the witness for witness fees in the amount and manner prescribed by Section 68093 of the Government Code. The fees are county charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

342.

(a) In any case in which a minor has been found to be a person described by Section 300 and the petitioner alleges new facts or circumstances, other than those under which the original petition was sustained, sufficient to state that the minor is a person described in Section 300, the petitioner shall file a subsequent petition. This section does not apply if the jurisdiction of the juvenile court has been terminated prior to the new allegations.

(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, all procedures and hearings required for an original petition are applicable to a subsequent petition filed under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 129.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Dependent Children—Hearings [345. - 359.]

345.

All cases under this chapter shall be heard at a special or separate session of the court, and no other matter shall be heard at such a session. No person on trial, awaiting trial, or under accusation of crime, other than a parent, guardian, or relative of the minor, shall be permitted to be present at any such session, except as a witness.

Cases in which the minor is detained and the sole allegation is that the minor is a person described in Section 300 shall be granted precedence on the calendar of the court for the day on which the case is set for hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1485, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

346.

Unless requested by a parent or guardian and consented to or requested by the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed, the public shall not be admitted to a juvenile court hearing. The judge or referee may nevertheless admit such persons as he deems to have a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case or the work of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 15.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

347.

At any juvenile court hearing conducted by a juvenile court judge, an official court reporter shall, and at any such hearing conducted by a juvenile court referee, the official reporter, as directed by the court, may take down in shorthand all the testimony and all of the statements and remarks of the judge and all persons appearing at the hearing; and, if directed by the judge, or requested by the person on whose behalf the petition was brought, or by his parent or legal guardian, or the attorneys of such persons, he must, within such reasonable time after the hearing of the petition as the court may designate, write out the same or such specific portions thereof as may be requested in plain and legible longhand or by typewriter or other printing machine and certify to the same as being correctly reported and transcribed, and when directed by the court, file the same with the clerk of the court. Unless otherwise directed by the judge, the costs of writing out and transcribing all or any portion of the reporter’s shorthand notes shall be paid in advance at the rates fixed for transcriptions in a civil action by the person requesting the same.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

348.

The provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 469) of Title 6 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to variance and amendment of pleadings in civil actions shall apply to petitions and proceedings under this chapter, to the same extent and with the same effect as if proceedings under this chapter were civil actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

349.

(a) A minor or nonminor dependent who is the subject of a juvenile court hearing, and any person entitled to notice of the hearing under Sections 290.1, 290.2, 291, 293, and 294 is entitled to be present at the hearing.

(b) The minor or nonminor dependent and any person who is entitled to that notice has the right to be represented at the hearing by counsel of their own choice.

(c) If the minor
 or nonminor dependent is present at the hearing, the court shall inform the minor or nonminor dependent that they have the right to address the court and participate in the hearing and the court shall allow the minor or nonminor dependent, if they so desire,
 to address the court and participate in the hearing.

(d) For a minor who is 10 years of age or older, or for a nonminor dependent, if they are not present at the hearing, the court shall determine whether the minor or nonminor dependent was properly notified of their right to attend the hearing and inquire whether the minor or nonminor dependent was given an opportunity to attend. If that minor or nonminor dependent was not properly notified or if the minor
 or nonminor dependent wished to be present and was not given an opportunity to be present, the court shall continue the hearing to allow the minor or nonminor dependent to be present unless, in the case of a minor, the court finds that it is in the best interest of the minor not to continue the hearing. The court shall continue the hearing only for that period of time necessary to provide notice and secure the presence of the
 minor or nonminor dependent. The court may issue any and all orders reasonably necessary to ensure that the minor or nonminor dependent has an opportunity to attend.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prevent or limit any minor’s or nonminor dependent’s right to attend or participate in the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 274, Sec. 2.   (AB 651)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

350.

(a) (1) The judge of the juvenile court shall control all proceedings during the hearings with a view to the expeditious and effective ascertainment of the jurisdictional facts and the ascertainment of all information relative to the present condition and future welfare of the person upon whose behalf the petition is brought. Except where there is a contested issue of fact or law, the proceedings shall be conducted in an informal nonadversary atmosphere with a view to obtaining the maximum cooperation of the minor upon whose behalf the petition is brought and all persons interested in his or her welfare with any provisions that the court may make for the disposition and care of the minor.

(2) Each juvenile court is encouraged to develop a dependency mediation program to provide a problem-solving forum for all interested persons to develop a plan in the best interests of the child, emphasizing family preservation and strengthening. The Legislature finds that mediation of these matters assists the court in resolving conflict, and helps the court to intervene in a constructive manner in those cases where court intervention is necessary. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person, except the mediator, who is required to report suspected child abuse pursuant to the Child Abuse and Neglect Reporting Act (Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code), shall be exempted from those requirements under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9 of the Evidence Code because he or she agreed to participate in a dependency mediation program established in the juvenile court.

If a dependency mediation program has been established in a juvenile court, and if mediation is requested by any person who the judge or referee deems to have a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case, or on the court’s own motion, the matter may be set for confidential mediation to develop a plan in the best interests of the child, utilizing resources within the family first and within the community if required.

(b) The testimony of a minor may be taken in chambers and outside the presence of the minor’s parent or parents, if the minor’s parent or parents are represented by counsel, the counsel is present and any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The court determines that testimony in chambers is necessary to ensure truthful testimony.

(2) The minor is likely to be intimidated by a formal courtroom setting.

(3) The minor is afraid to testify in front of his or her parent or parents.

After testimony in chambers, the parent or parents of the minor may elect to have the court reporter read back the testimony or have the testimony summarized by counsel for the parent or parents.

The testimony of a minor also may be taken in chambers and outside the presence of the guardian or guardians of a minor under the circumstances specified in this subdivision.

(c) At any hearing in which the probation department bears the burden of proof, after the presentation of evidence on behalf of the probation department and the minor has been closed, the court, on motion of the minor, parent, or guardian, or on its own motion, shall order whatever action the law requires of it if the court, upon weighing all of the evidence then before it, finds that the burden of proof has not been met. That action includes, but is not limited to, the dismissal of the petition and release of the minor at a jurisdictional hearing, the return of the minor at an out-of-home review held prior to the permanency planning hearing, or the termination of jurisdiction at an in-home review. If the motion is not granted, the parent or guardian may offer evidence without first having reserved that right.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 772, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

352.

(a) (1) Upon request of counsel for the parent, guardian, minor, or petitioner, the court may continue any hearing under this chapter beyond the time limit within which the hearing is otherwise required to be held, provided that a continuance shall not be granted that is contrary to the interest of the minor. In considering the minor’s interests, the court shall give substantial weight to a minor’s need for prompt resolution of his or her custody status, the need to provide children with stable environments, and the damage to a minor of prolonged temporary placements.

(2) Continuances shall be granted only upon a showing of good cause and only for that period of time shown to be necessary by the evidence
 presented at the hearing on the motion for the continuance. Neither a stipulation between counsel nor the convenience of the parties is in and of itself a good cause. Further, neither a pending criminal prosecution nor family law matter shall be considered in and of itself as good cause. Whenever any continuance is granted, the facts proven which require the continuance shall be entered upon the minutes of the court.

(3) In order to obtain a motion for a continuance of the hearing, written notice shall be filed at least two court days prior to the date set for hearing, together with affidavits or declarations detailing specific facts showing that a continuance is necessary, unless the court for good cause entertains an oral motion for continuance.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a minor has been removed from the parents’ or guardians’ custody, a continuance shall not be
 granted that would result in the dispositional hearing, held pursuant to Section 361, being completed longer than 60 days, or 30 days in the case of an Indian child, after the hearing at which the minor was ordered removed or detained, unless the court finds that there are exceptional circumstances requiring a continuance. If the court knows or has reason to know that the child is an Indian child, the absence of the opinion of a qualified expert witness shall not, in and of itself, support a finding that exceptional circumstances exist. The facts supporting a continuance shall be entered upon the minutes of the court. The court shall not grant continuances that would cause the hearing pursuant to Section 361 to be completed more than six months after the hearing pursuant to Section 319.

(c) In any case in which the parent, guardian, or minor is represented by counsel and no objection is made to an order continuing any such hearing beyond the
 time limit within which the hearing is otherwise required to be held, the absence of such an objection shall be deemed a consent to the continuance. The consent does not affect the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 25.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

At the beginning of the hearing on a petition filed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 325) of this chapter, the judge or clerk shall first read the petition to those present. Upon request of any parent, guardian, or adult relative, counsel for the minor, or the minor, if he or she is present, the judge shall explain any term of allegation contained therein and the nature of the hearing, its procedures, and possible consequences. The judge shall ascertain whether the parent, guardian, or adult relative and, when required by Section 317, the minor have been informed of their right to be represented by counsel, and if not, the judge shall advise those persons, if present, of the right to have counsel present and where applicable, of the right to appointed counsel. If such a person is unable to afford counsel and desires to be represented by counsel, the court shall appoint counsel in accordance with Section 317. The court shall continue the hearing for not to exceed seven days, as necessary to make an appointment of counsel, or to enable counsel to acquaint himself or herself with the case, or to determine whether the parent or guardian or adult relative is unable to afford counsel at his or her own expense, and shall continue the hearing as necessary to provide reasonable opportunity for the minor and the parent or guardian or adult relative to prepare for the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 913, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

353.1.

(a) At the hearing on a petition filed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 325) of this chapter, any person adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court shall be informed, both orally and in writing by the court as provided in subdivision (b), of both of the following:

(1) His or her rights pursuant to Section 388.

(2) The procedure for bringing a petition pursuant to Section 388, including the availability of all appropriate and necessary Judicial Council forms.

(b) Where the dependent child has attained the age of 12 years, the court shall directly inform the child as required by subdivision (a) in clear language appropriate for the child’s level of cognitive development. Where the dependent child is under the age of 12 years, the court shall inform the child as required by subdivision (a) through the child’s guardian ad litem or legal counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

354.

Except where a minor is in custody, any hearing on a petition filed pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 325) of this chapter may be continued by the court for not more than 10 days in addition to any other continuance authorized in this chapter whenever the court is satisfied that an unavailable and necessary witness will be available within such time. If the court knows or has reason to know that the child is an Indian child, the failure to retain in a timely manner the services of a qualified expert witness shall not, in and of itself, demonstrate that a necessary witness is unavailable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 26.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

(a) At the jurisdictional hearing, the court shall first consider only the question whether the minor is a person described by Section 300. Any legally admissible evidence that is relevant to the circumstances or acts that are alleged to bring the minor within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court is admissible and may be received in evidence. Proof by a preponderance of evidence must be adduced to support a finding that the minor is a person described by Section 300. Objections that could have been made to evidence introduced shall be deemed to have been made by a parent or guardian who is present at the hearing and unrepresented by counsel, unless the court finds that the parent or guardian has made a knowing and intelligent waiver of the right to counsel. Objections that could have
 been made to evidence introduced shall be deemed to have been made by an unrepresented child.

(b) A social study prepared by the petitioning agency, and hearsay evidence contained in it, is admissible and constitutes competent evidence upon which a finding of jurisdiction pursuant to Section 300 may be based, to the extent allowed by subdivisions (c) and (d).

(1) For purposes of this section, “social study” means any written report furnished to the juvenile court and to all parties or their counsel by the county probation or welfare department in any matter involving the custody, status, or welfare of a minor in a dependency proceeding pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 300) to Article 12 (commencing with Section 385), inclusive.

(2) The preparer of the social study shall be made available for
 cross-examination upon a timely request by a party. The court may deem the preparer available for cross-examination if it determines that the preparer is on telephone standby and can be present in court within a reasonable time of the request.

(3) The court may grant a reasonable continuance not to exceed 10 days upon request by any party if the social study is not provided to the parties or their counsel within a reasonable time before the hearing.

(c) (1) If a party to the jurisdictional hearing raises a timely objection to the admission of specific hearsay evidence contained in a social study, the specific hearsay evidence shall not be sufficient by itself to support a jurisdictional finding or any ultimate fact upon which a jurisdictional finding is based, unless the petitioner establishes one or more of the following exceptions:

(A) The hearsay evidence would be admissible in any civil or criminal proceeding under any statutory or decisional exception to the prohibition against hearsay.

(B) The hearsay declarant is a minor under 12 years of age who is the subject of the jurisdictional hearing. However, the hearsay statement of a minor under 12 years of age shall not be admissible if the objecting party establishes that the statement is unreliable because it was the product of fraud, deceit, or undue influence.

(C) The hearsay declarant is a peace officer as defined by Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, a health practitioner described in paragraphs (21) to (28), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7 of the Penal Code, a social worker licensed pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with
 Section 4991) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a teacher who holds a credential pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 44200) of Part 25 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code. For the purpose of this subdivision, evidence in a declaration is admissible only to the extent that it would otherwise be admissible under this section or if the declarant were present and testifying in court.

(D) The hearsay declarant is available for cross-examination. For purposes of this section, the court may deem a witness available for cross-examination if it determines that the witness is on telephone standby and can be present in court within a reasonable time of a request to examine the witness.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an objection is timely if it identifies with reasonable specificity the disputed hearsay evidence and it gives the petitioner a
 reasonable period of time to meet the objection prior to a contested hearing.

(d) This section shall not be construed to limit the right of a party to the jurisdictional hearing to subpoena a witness whose statement is contained in the social study or to introduce admissible evidence relevant to the weight of the hearsay evidence or the credibility of the hearsay declarant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 181.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

355.1.

(a) Where the court finds, based upon competent professional evidence, that an injury, injuries, or detrimental condition sustained by a minor is of a nature as would ordinarily not be sustained except as the result of the unreasonable or neglectful acts or omissions of either parent, the guardian, or other person who has the care or custody of the minor, that finding shall be prima facie evidence that the minor is a person described by subdivision (a), (b), or (d) of Section 300.

(b) Proof that either parent, the guardian, or other person who has the care or custody of a minor who is the subject of a petition filed under Section 300 has physically abused, neglected, or cruelly treated another minor shall be admissible in evidence.

(c) The presumption created by subdivision (a) constitutes a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(d) Where the court finds that either a parent, a guardian, or any other person who resides with, or has the care or custody of, a minor who is currently the subject of the petition filed under Section 300 (1) has been previously convicted of sexual abuse as defined in Section 11165.1 of the Penal Code, (2) has been previously convicted of an act in another state that would constitute sexual abuse as defined in Section 11165.1 of the Penal Code if committed in this state, (3) has been found in a prior dependency hearing or similar proceeding in the corresponding court of another state to have committed an act of sexual abuse, or (4) is required, as the result of a felony conviction, to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, that finding shall be prima facie evidence in any proceeding that the subject minor is a person described by subdivision (a), (b), (c), or (d) of Section 300 and is at substantial risk of abuse or neglect. The prima facie evidence constitutes a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(e) Where the court believes that a child has suffered criminal abuse or neglect, the court may direct a representative of the child protective agency to take action pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 11166 of the Penal Code.

(f) Testimony by a parent, guardian, or other person who has the care or custody of the minor made the subject of a proceeding under Section 300 shall not be admissible as evidence in any other action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.   Effective September 16, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

After hearing the evidence, the court shall make a finding, noted in the minutes of the court, whether or not the minor is a person described by Section 300 and the specific subdivisions of Section 300 under which the petition is sustained. If it finds that the minor is not such a person, it shall order that the petition be dismissed and the minor be discharged from any detention or restriction theretofore ordered. If the court finds that the minor is such a person, it shall make and enter its findings and order accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1122, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

356.5.

A child advocate appointed by the court to represent the interests of a dependent child in a proceeding under this chapter shall have the same duties and responsibilities as a guardian ad litem and shall be trained by and function under the auspices of a court appointed special advocate guardian ad litem program, formed and operating under the guidelines established by the National Court Appointed Special Advocate Association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1341, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

357.

Whenever the court, before or during the hearing on the petition, is of the opinion that the minor is mentally ill or if the court is in doubt concerning the mental health of any such person, the court may order that such person be held temporarily in the psychopathic ward of the county hospital or hospital whose services have been approved and/or contracted for by the department of health of the county, for observation and recommendation concerning the future care, supervision, and treatment of such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1068.)
-------------------------------------------

358.

(a) After finding that a child is a person described in Section 300, the court shall hear evidence on the question of the proper disposition to be made of the child. Prior to making a finding required by this section, the court may continue the hearing on its own motion, the motion of the parent or guardian, or the motion of the child, as follows:

(1) If the child is detained during the continuance, and the social worker is not alleging that subdivision (b) of Section 361.5 is applicable, the continuance shall not exceed 10 judicial days. The court may make an order for detention of the child or for the child’s release from detention, during the period of continuance, as is appropriate.

(2) If the child is not detained during the continuance, the continuance shall not exceed 30 days after the date of the finding pursuant to Section 356. However, the court may, for cause, continue the hearing for an additional 15 days.

(3) If the social worker is alleging that subdivision (b) of Section 361.5 is applicable, the court shall continue the proceedings for a period not to exceed 30 days. The social worker shall notify each parent of the content of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5 and shall inform each parent that if the court does not order reunification a permanency planning hearing will be held, and that their parental rights may be terminated within the timeframes specified by law.

(b) (1) Before determining the appropriate disposition, the court shall receive in evidence the social study of the child made by the social worker, any study or evaluation made by a child advocate appointed by the court, and other relevant and material evidence as may be offered, including, but not limited to, the willingness of the caregiver to provide legal permanency for the child if reunification is unsuccessful. In any judgment and order of disposition, the court shall specifically state that the social study made by the social worker and the study or evaluation made by the child advocate appointed by the court, if there be any, has been read and considered by the court in arriving at its judgment and order of disposition. Any social study or report submitted to the court by the social worker shall include the individual child’s case plan developed pursuant to Section 16501.1.

(2) Whenever a child is removed from a parent’s or guardian’s custody, the court shall make a finding as to whether the social worker has exercised due diligence in conducting the investigation, as required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 309, to identify, locate, and notify the child’s relatives, including both maternal and paternal relatives.

(3) When making the determination required pursuant to paragraph (2), the court may consider, among other examples of due diligence, the extent to which the social worker has complied with paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 309, and has done any of the following:

(A) Asked the child, in an age-appropriate manner and consistent with the child’s
 best interest, about their relatives.

(B) Obtained information regarding the location of the child’s relatives.

(C) Reviewed the child’s case file for any information regarding the child’s relatives.

(D) Telephoned, emailed, or visited all identified relatives.

(E) Asked located relatives for the names and locations of other relatives.

(F) Used internet search tools to locate relatives identified as supports.

(c) If the court finds that a child is described by subdivision (h) of Section 300 or that subdivision (b) of Section 361.5 may be applicable,
 the court shall conduct the dispositional proceeding pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 361.5.

(d) (1) The court shall hold a dispositional proceeding for a youth 18 years of age if both of the following requirements are met:

(A) The youth was found to be a minor described in Section 300 at a hearing pursuant to Section 355 prior to the youth attaining 18 years of age, and was continuously detained pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 319.

(B) The youth has provided informed consent to the dispositional proceeding.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the fact that a
 youth has attained 18 years of age shall not be cause to relieve counsel appointed pursuant to Section 317.

(3) A dispositional proceeding for a youth as described in paragraph (1) shall be held within 30 days of the date of the finding pursuant to Section 355.

(4) At the dispositional proceeding, the court shall determine by clear and convincing evidence if at least one of the conditions described in subdivision (c) of Section 361 existed immediately prior to the youth attaining 18 years of age.

(5) (A) If the youth does not provide informed consent to the dispositional proceeding, or the court does not find the criteria described in paragraph (4),
 the court shall vacate the temporary orders made under Section 319 and dependency or general jurisdiction shall not be retained.

(B) If the court finds that the youth meets the criteria described in paragraph (4) but chooses not to remain in foster care, the court shall set a hearing for termination of jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391 within 30 days.
